Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 2. Public Access to Agency Law and Policy.

§ 25-43-2.101.
Publication, compilation, indexing and public inspection of rules.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the Secretary of State shall prescribe a uniform numbering system, form, style and transmitting format for all proposed and adopted rules caused to be published by him and, with prior approval of each respective agency involved, may edit rules for publication and codification without changing the meaning or effect of any rule.

The Secretary of State shall cause an administrative bulletin to be published in a format and at such regular intervals as the Secretary of State shall prescribe by rule. Upon proper filing of proposed rules, the Secretary of State shall publish them in the administrative bulletin as expeditiously as possible. The administrative bulletin must contain:

Notices of proposed rule adoption prepared so that the text of the proposed rule shows the text of any existing rule proposed to be changed and the change proposed;

Any other notices and materials designated by law for publication therein; and

An index to its contents by subject.

The Secretary of State shall cause an administrative bulletin to be published in a format and at such regular intervals as the Secretary of State shall prescribe by rule. Upon proper filing of newly adopted rules, the Secretary of State shall publish them as expeditiously as possible. The administrative bulletin must contain:

Newly filed adopted rules prepared so that the text shows the text of any existing rule being changed and the change being made;

Any other notices and materials designated by law for publication therein; and

An index to its contents by subject.

The Secretary of State retains the authority to reject proposed and newly adopted rules not properly filed in accordance with the Secretary of State’s rules prescribing the numbering system, form, style or transmitting format for such filings. The Secretary of State shall not be empowered to reject filings for reasons of the substance or content or any proposed or newly adopted rule. The Secretary of State shall notify the agency of its rejection of a proposed or newly adopted rule as expeditiously as possible and accompany such notification with a stated reason for the rejection. A rejected filing of a proposed or newly adopted rule does not constitute filing pursuant to Section 25-43-3.101 et seq. of this chapter.

The Secretary of State shall cause an administrative code to be compiled, indexed by subject and published in a format prescribed by the Secretary of State by rule. All of the effective rules of each agency must be published and indexed in that publication. The Secretary of State shall also cause supplements to the administrative code to be published in a format and at such regular intervals as the Secretary of State shall prescribe by rule.

The Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation is hereby authorized to contract with a reputable and competent publishing company on such terms and conditions and at such prices as may be deemed proper to digest, compile, annotate, index and publish the state agency rules and regulations.

Copyrights of the Mississippi Administrative Code, including, but not limited to, cross references, tables of cases, notes of decisions, tables of contents, indices, source notes, authority notes, numerical lists and codification guides, other than the actual text of rules or regulations, shall be taken by and in the name of the publishers of said compilation. Such publishers shall thereafter promptly assign the same to the State of Mississippi and said copyright shall be owned by the state.

Any information appearing on the same leaf with the text of any rule or regulation may be incidentally reproduced in connection with the reproduction of such rule or regulation, if such reproduction is for private use and not for resale.

The Secretary of State may omit from the administrative bulletin or code any proposed or filed adopted rule, the publication in hard copy of which would be unduly cumbersome, expensive or otherwise inexpedient, if:

Knowledge of the rule is likely to be important to only a small class of persons;

On application to the issuing agency, the proposed or adopted rule in printed or processed form is made available at no more than its cost of reproduction; and

The administrative bulletin or code contains a notice stating in detail the specific subject matter of the omitted proposed or adopted rule and how a copy of the omitted material may be obtained.

The administrative bulletin and administrative code with supplements must be furnished to designated officials without charge and to all subscribers at a reasonable cost to be determined by the Secretary of State. Each agency shall also make available for public inspection and copying those portions of the administrative bulletin and administrative code containing all rules adopted or used by the agency in the discharge of its functions, and the index to those rules.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-2.102.
Public inspection and indexing of agency orders.

In addition to other requirements imposed by any provision of law, and subject to any confidentiality provisions established by law, each agency shall make all written final orders available for public inspection and copying and index them by name and subject.

A written final order available for public inspection pursuant to subsection (1) may not be relied on as precedent by an agency to the detriment of any person until it has been made available for public inspection and indexed in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section. This provision is inapplicable to any person who has actual, timely knowledge of the order. The burden of proving that knowledge is on the agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-2.103.
Declaratory opinions.

Any person with a substantial interest in the subject matter may make a written request of an agency for a declaratory opinion as to the applicability to specified circumstances of a statute, rule or order within the primary jurisdiction of the agency. Such written request must clearly set forth the specific facts upon which an opinion is asked for and shall be limited to a single transaction or occurrence. An agency, through the agency head or its designee(s) by rule, shall issue a declaratory opinion in response to a written request for that opinion unless the agency determines that issuance of the opinion under the circumstances would be contrary to a rule adopted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

Each agency shall issue rules that provide for: (a) the form, contents and filing of written requests for declaratory opinions; (b) the procedural rights of persons in relation to the written requests; and (c) the disposition of the written requests. Those rules must describe the classes of circumstances in which the agency will not issue a declaratory opinion.

Within forty-five (45) days after receipt of a written request for a declaratory opinion, an agency, in writing, shall:

Issue an opinion declaring the applicability of the statute, rule or order in question to the specified circumstances;

Agree to issue a declaratory opinion by a specified time but no later than ninety (90) days after receipt of the written request; or

Decline to issue a declaratory opinion, stating the reasons for its action.

A copy of all opinions issued in response to a written request for a declaratory opinion must be mailed promptly to the requesting person.

When any person receives a declaratory opinion from an agency and shall have stated all the facts to govern such opinion, the agency shall take no civil or criminal action against such person who, in good faith, follows the direction of such opinion and acts in accordance therewith unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after a full hearing, shall judicially declare that such opinion is manifestly wrong and without any substantial support. No declaratory opinion shall be given or considered if the opinion is requested after suit is filed or prosecution begun. Any declaratory opinion rendered pursuant to this chapter shall not be binding or effective for any third party or person other than the agency issuing the declaratory opinion and the person to whom the opinion is issued and shall not be used as precedent for any other transaction or occurrence beyond that set forth by the requesting person.

The authority of persons to request and receive agency declaratory opinions in no way affects the ability of any person authorized by Section 7-5-25 to request a legal opinion from the Attorney General.

Subject to any confidentiality provisions established by law, each agency shall make all declaratory opinions available for public inspection and copying and shall index them by name and subject, unless information contained within such opinions is confidential by statute or exempt from public disclosure pursuant to another provision of law.

Without in any way limiting a person’s right to request and receive a declaratory opinion under this section, or an agency’s duty to issue a declaratory opinion under this section, nothing contained in this section shall prohibit an agency from providing informal responses or advice, orally or in writing, to any inquiries or requests for information submitted to the agency. Informal responses shall not be considered a declaratory opinion under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 9; Laws, 2005, ch. 499, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-2.104.
Required rule-making.

In addition to other rule-making requirements imposed by law, each agency shall:

Adopt as a rule a description of the organization of the agency which states the general course and method of its operations and where and how the public may obtain information or make submissions or requests;

Adopt rules of practice setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal proceedings available to the public.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 25-43-2.105.
Model rules of procedure.

In accordance with the rule-making requirements of this chapter, the Secretary of State shall adopt model rules of procedure appropriate for use by as many agencies as possible. The model rules must deal with all general functions and duties performed in common by several agencies. Each agency may adopt as much of the model rules as is practicable under its circumstances. To the extent an agency adopts the model rules, it shall do so in accordance with the rule-making requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2005.